Utah statutes.
17-37-6.   Rules and regulations -- Use of planetarium by nonresidents.

The planetarium board of directors shall adopt rules and regulations for the use and operations of any planetarium acquired and established by the county.  All persons visiting or using the planetarium shall be subject to the rules and regulations adopted by the board.  The board may exclude from the use of the planetarium any and all persons who willfully violate the rules.  The board may extend the privileges and use of the planetarium to persons residing outside of the county upon such terms and conditions as may be prescribed by its regulations.

